Montana, session 2025, HB545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 5-11-222, MCA, is amended to read:
"5-11-222. Reports to legislature. (1) (a) Except as provided in subsections (1)(b) and (5), a report
to the legislature means a biennial report required by the legislature and filed in accordance with 5-11-210 on or
before September 1 of each year preceding the convening of a regular session of the legislature.
(b) If otherwise specified in law, a report may be required more or less frequently than the biennial
requirement in subsection (1)(a).
(2) Reports to the legislature include:
(a) annual reports on the unified investment program for public funds and public retirement
systems and state compensation insurance fund assets audits from the board of investments in accordance
with Article VIII, section 13, of the Montana constitution;
(b) federal mandates requirements from the governor in accordance with 2-1-407;
(c) activities of the state records committee in accordance with 2-6-1108;
(d) revenue studies from the director of revenue, if requested, in accordance with 2-7-104;
(e) legislative audit reports from the legislative audit division in accordance with 2-8-112 and 23-7-
410;
(f) the annual performance report of each department to the appropriate interim budget committee
and legislative policy interim committee in accordance with 2-12-105;
(g) progress on gender and racial balance from the governor in accordance with 2-15-108;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(h) a mental health report from the ombudsman in accordance with 2-15-210;
(i) policies related to children and families from the interagency coordinating council for state
prevention in accordance with 2-15-225;
(j) watercourse name changes, if any, from the secretary of state in accordance with 2-15-401;
(k) results of programs established in 2-15-3111 through 2-15-3113 from the livestock loss board
in accordance with 2-15-3113;
(l) the allocation of space report from the department of administration required in accordance
with 2-17-101;
(m) information technology activities in accordance with 2-17-512;
(n) state strategic information technology plan exceptions, if granted, from the department of
administration in accordance with 2-17-515;
(o) the state strategic information technology plan and biennial report from the department of
administration in accordance with 2-17-521 and 2-17-522;
(p) reports from standing, interim, and administrative committees, if prepared, in accordance with
2-17-825 and 5-5-216;
(q) statistical and other data related to business transacted by the courts from the court
administrator, if requested, in accordance with 3-1-702;
(r) the judicial standards commission report in accordance with 3-1-1126;
(s) an annual report on the actual cost of legislation that had a projected fiscal impact from the
office of budget and program planning in accordance with 5-4-208;
(t) a link to annual state agency reports on grants awarded in the previous fiscal year established
by the legislative finance committee in accordance with 5-12-208;
(u) reports prepared by the legislative fiscal analyst, and as determined by the analyst, in
accordance with 5-12-302(4);
(v) a report, if necessary, on administrative policies or rules adopted under 5-11-105 that may
impair the independence of the legislative audit division in accordance with 5-13-305;
(w) if a waste of state resources occurs, a report from the legislative state auditor, in accordance
with 5-13-311;
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(x) school funding commission reports each fifth interim in accordance with 5-20-301;
(y) a report of political committee operations conducted on state-owned property, if required, from
a political committee to the legislative services division in accordance with 13-37-404;
(z) a report concerning taxable value from the department of revenue in accordance with 15-1-
205;
(aa) a report on tax credits from the revenue interim committee in accordance with 15-30-2303;
(bb) semiannual reports on the Montana heritage preservation and development account from the
Montana heritage preservation and development commission in accordance with 15-65-121;
(cc) general marijuana regulation reports and medical marijuana registry reports from the
department of revenue in accordance with 16-12-110;
(dd) annual reports on general fund and nongeneral fund encumbrances from the department of
administration in accordance with 17-1-102;
(ee) loans or loan extensions authorized for two consecutive fiscal years from the department of
administration and office of commissioner of higher education, including negative cash balances from the
commissioner of higher education, in accordance with 17-2-107;
(ff) a report of local government entities that have balances contrary to limitations provided for in
17-2-302 or that failed to reduce the charge from the department of administration in accordance with 17-2-304;
(gg) an annual report from the board of investments in accordance with 17-5-1650(2);
(hh) a quarterly report from the office of budget and program planning to the legislative finance
committee identifying the amount and the type of debt payoff or other expenditure from the debt and liability
free account in accordance with 17-6-214;
(ii) a report on retirement system trust investments and benefits from the board of investments in
accordance with 17-6-230;
(jj) recommendations for reductions in spending and related analysis, if required, from the office of
budget and program planning in accordance with 17-7-140;
(kk) a statewide facility inventory and condition assessment from the department of administration
in accordance with 17-7-202;
(ll) actuary reports and investigations for public retirement systems from the public employees'
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
retirement board in accordance with 19-2-405;
(mm) a work report from the public employees' retirement board in accordance with 19-2-407;
(nn) annual actuarial reports and evaluations from the teachers' retirement board in accordance with
19-20-201;
(oo) reports from the state director of K-12 career and vocational and technical education, as
requested, in accordance with 20-7-308;
(pp) 5-year state plan for career and technical education reports from the board of regents in
accordance with 20-7-330;
(qq) a gifted and talented students report from the office of public instruction in accordance with 20-
7-904;
(rr) status changes for at-risk students from the office of public instruction in accordance with 20-9-
328;
(ss) status changes for American Indian students from the office of public instruction in accordance
with 20-9-330;
(tt) reports regarding the Montana Indian language preservation program from the office of public
instruction in accordance with 20-9-537;
(uu) proposals for funding community colleges from the board of regents in accordance with 20-15-
309;
(vv) expenditures and activities of the Montana agricultural experiment station and extension
service, as requested, in accordance with 20-25-236;
(ww) reports, if requested by the legislature, from the president of each of the units of the higher
education system in accordance with 20-25-305;
(xx) reports, if prepared by a public postsecondary institution, regarding free expression activities on
campus in accordance with 20-25-1506;
(yy) reports from the Montana historical society trustees in accordance with 22-3-107;
(zz) state lottery reports in accordance with 23-7-202;
(aaa) state fund reports, if required, from the commissioner in accordance with 33-1-115;
(bbb) reports from the department of labor and industry in accordance with 39-6-101;
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(ccc) victim unemployment benefits reports from the department of labor and industry in accordance
with 39-51-2111;
(ddd) state fund business reports in accordance with 39-71-2363;
(eee) risk-based capital reports, if required, from the state fund in accordance with 39-71-2375;
(fff) child custody reports from the office of the court administrator in accordance with 41-3-1004;
(ggg) reports of remission of fine or forfeiture, respite, commutation, or pardon granted from the
governor in accordance with 46-23-316;
(hhh) annual statewide public defender reports from the office of state public defender in accordance
with 47-1-125;
(iii) a trauma care system report from the department of public health and human services in
accordance with 50-6-402;
(jjj) an annual report on chemical abortion data from the department of public health and human
services in accordance with 50-20-709;
(kkk) Montana criminal justice oversight council reports in accordance with 53-1-216;
(lll) medicaid block grant reports from the department of public health and human services in
accordance with 53-1-611;
(mmm) reports on the approval and implementation status of medicaid section 1115 waivers in
accordance with 53-2-215;
(nnn) provider rate, medicaid waiver, or medicaid state plan change reports from the department of
public health and human services in accordance with 53-6-101;
(ooo) medicaid funding reports from the department of public health and human services in
accordance with 53-6-110;
(ppp) proposals regarding managed care for medicaid recipients, if required, from the department of
public health and human services in accordance with 53-6-116;
(qqq) reports on toxicology and prescription drug registry information from the suicide prevention
officer in accordance with 53-21-1101;
(rrr) suicide reduction plans from the department of public health and human services in
accordance with 53-21-1102;
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(sss) annual compliance reports from certifying organizations to the criminal justice oversight council
in accordance with 53-24-311;
(ttt) a compliance and inspection report from the department of corrections in accordance with 53-
30-604;
(uuu) emergency medical services grants from the department of transportation in accordance with
61-2-109;
(vvv) annual financial reports on the environmental contingency account from the department of
environmental quality in accordance with 75-1-1101;
(www) a report from the land board, if prepared, in accordance with 76-12-109;
(xxx) an annual state trust land report from the land board in accordance with 77-1-223;
(yyy) a noxious plant report, if prepared, from the department of agriculture in accordance with 80-7-
713;
(zzz) state water plans from the department of natural resources and conservation in accordance
with 85-1-203;
(aaaa) reports on the allocation of renewable resources grants and loans for emergencies, if required,
from the department of natural resources and conservation in accordance with 85-1-605;
(bbbb) water storage projects from the governor's office in accordance with 85-1-704;
(cccc) upper Clark Fork River basin steering committee reports, if prepared, in accordance with 85-2-
338;
(dddd) upland game bird enhancement program reports in accordance with 87-1-250;
(eeee) private land/public wildlife advisory committee reports in accordance with 87-1-269;
(ffff) a future fisheries improvement program report from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in
accordance with 87-1-272;
(gggg) license revenue recommendations from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in
accordance with 87-1-629;
(hhhh) reports from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks on conservation licenses sold and
revenue received in accordance with 87-2-201;
(iiii) hydrocarbon and geology investigation reports from the bureau of mines and geology in
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
accordance with 90-2-201;
(jjjj) coal ash markets investigation reports from the department of commerce in accordance with
90-2-202;
(kkkk) an annual report from the pacific northwest electric power and conservation planning council in
accordance with 90-4-403;
(llll) community property-assessed capital enhancements program reports from the Montana facility
finance authority in accordance with 90-4-1303;
(mmmm) veterans' home loan mortgage loan reports from the board of housing in accordance
with 90-6-604;
(nnnn) matching infrastructure planning grant awards by the department of commerce in accordance
with 90-6-703(3); and
(oooo) Montana coal endowment program reports from the department of commerce in accordance
with 90-6-710.
(3) Reports to the legislature include reports made to an interim committee as follows:
(a) reports to the law and justice interim committee, including:
(i) a report on fentanyl-related mandatory minimums from the attorney general in accordance with
2-15-505;
(ii) findings of the domestic violence fatality review commission in accordance with 2-15-2017;
(iii) the report from the missing indigenous persons review commission in accordance with 2-15-
2018;
(iv) reports from the department of justice and public safety officer standards and training council in
accordance with 2-15-2029;
(v) reports on district court judge caseload and substitutions from the office of court administrator
in accordance with 3-1-713;
(vi) information on the Montana False Claims Act from the department of justice in accordance with
17-8-416;
(vii) annual case status reports from the attorney general in accordance with 41-3-210;
(viii) an annual report from the department of public health and human services on the number of
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
referrals to county attorneys pursuant to 41-3-202(1)(b)(i) in accordance with 41-3-211;
(ix) office of court administrator reports in accordance with 41-5-2003;
(x) reports on pending investigations from the public safety officer standards and training council in
accordance with 44-4-408;
(xi) statewide public safety communications system activities from the department of justice in
accordance with 44-4-1606;
(xii) the annual report on the activities of the sexual assault response network program and the
sexual assault response team committee from the department of justice in accordance with 44-4-1705;
(xiii) reports on the status of the crisis intervention team training program from the board of crime
control in accordance with 44-7-110;
(xiv) restorative justice grant program status and performance from the board of crime control in
accordance with 44-7-302;
(xv) law enforcement agency facial recognition technology use reports from the department of
justice in accordance with 44-15-111(3);
(xvi) reports on third-party vendors providing facial recognition services to state agencies reports in
accordance with 44-15-111(4)(b);
(xvii) reports on offenders under supervision with new offenses or violations from the department of
corrections in accordance with 46-23-1016;
(xviii) supervision responses grid reports from the department of corrections in accordance with 46-
23-1028;
(xix) statewide public defender reports and information from the office of state public defender in
accordance with 47-1-125;
(xx) every 5 years, a percentage change in public defender funding report from the legislative fiscal
analyst in accordance with 47-1-125;
(xxi) every 5 years, statewide public defender reports on the percentage change in funding from the
office of state public defender in accordance with 47-1-125; and
(xxii) a report from the quality assurance unit from the department of corrections in accordance with
53-1-211;
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(b) reports to the state administration and veterans' affairs interim committee, including:
(i) a report that includes information technology activities and additional information from the
information technology board in accordance with 2-17-512 and 2-17-513;
(ii) a report from the capitol complex advisory council in accordance with 2-17-804;
(iii) a report on the employee incentive award program from the department of administration in
accordance with 2-18-1103;
(iv) a board of veterans' affairs report in accordance with 10-2-102;
(v) a report on the decennial veterans' long-term care needs study from the department of public
health and human services and the Montana veterans' affairs division in accordance with 10-2-903;
(vi) a report on grants to the Montana civil air patrol from the department of military affairs in
accordance with 10-3-802;
(vii) annual reports on statewide election security from the secretary of state in accordance with 13-
1-205;
(viii) reports on money received in the special account for implementing the Help America Vote Act
from the secretary of state in accordance with 13-1-209;
(ix) a report regarding the youth voting program, if requested, from the secretary of state in
accordance with 13-22-108;
(x) a report from the commissioner of political practices in accordance with 13-37-120;
(xi) a report on retirement system trust investments from the board of investments in accordance
with 17-6-230;
(xii) actuarial valuations and other reports from the public employees' retirement board in
accordance with 19-2-405 and 19-3-117;
(xiii) actuarial valuations and other reports from the teachers' retirement board in accordance with
19-20-201 and 19-20-216;
(xiv) a report on the reemployment of retired members of the teachers' retirement system from the
teachers' retirement board in accordance with 19-20-732; and
(xv) changes, if any, affecting filing-office rules under the Uniform Commercial Code from the
secretary of state in accordance with 30-9A-527;
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(c) reports to the children, families, health, and human services interim committee, including:
(i) a report from the department of public health and human services on the programs, grants, and
services funded under the healing and ending addiction through recovery and treatment account in 16-12-122;
(ii) Montana foster youth higher education assistance program grant reports from the
commissioner of higher education in accordance with 20-26-633;
(iii) prescription drug registry reports from the board of pharmacy in accordance with 37-7-1514;
(iv) Montana HELP Act workforce development reports from the department of public health and
human services in accordance with 39-12-103;
(v) reports from the department of public health and human services on the department's efforts
regarding the volunteer program to support child protective services activities in accordance with 41-3-132;
(vi) annual reports from the child and family ombudsman in accordance with 41-3-1211;
(vii) reports on activities and recommendations on child protective services activities, if required,
from the child and family ombudsman in accordance with 41-3-1215;
(viii) reports on the out-of-state placement of high-risk children with multiagency service needs from
the department of public health and human services in accordance with 52-2-311;
(ix) private alternative adolescent residential and outdoor programs reports from the department of
public health and human services in accordance with 52-2-803;
(x) provider rate, medicaid waiver, or medicaid state plan change reports from the department of
public health and human services in accordance with 53-6-101;
(xi) a report from the department of public health and human services on home and community-
based services provider information in 53-6-406;
(xii) a report concerning mental health managed care services, if managed care is in place, from the
advisory council in accordance with 53-6-710;
(xiii) quarterly medicaid reports related to expansion from the department of public health and
human services in accordance with 53-6-1325;
(xiv) annual Montana developmental center reports from the department of public health and human
services in accordance with 53-20-225; and
(xv) annual children's mental health outcomes from the department of public health and human
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
services in accordance with 53-21-508;
(xvi) suicide reduction plans from the department of public health and human services in
accordance with 53-21-1102;
(d) reports to the economic affairs interim committee, including:
(i) the annual state compensation insurance fund budget from the board of directors in
accordance with 5-5-223 and 39-71-2363;
(ii) medical marijuana registry reports from the department of revenue in accordance with 16-12-
110;
(iii) general marijuana regulation reports from the department of revenue in accordance with 16-12-
110(3);
(iv) annual reports on complaints against physicians certifying medical marijuana use from the
board of medical examiners in accordance with 16-12-110(6);
(v) an annual report on the administrative rate required from the department of commerce from the
Montana heritage preservation and development commission in accordance with 22-3-1002;
(vi) biennial reports from the department of labor and industry on weighing device license fees and
cost increases in accordance with 30-12-203;
(vii) state fund reports from the insurance commissioner, if required, in accordance with 33-1-115;
(viii) risk-based capital reports, if required, from the state fund in accordance with 33-1-115 and 39-
71-2375;
(ix) annual reinsurance reports from the Montana reinsurance association board required in
accordance with 33-22-1308;
(x) reports from the department of labor and industry concerning board attendance in accordance
with 37-1-107;
(xi) annual reports on physician complaints related to medical marijuana from the board of medical
examiners in accordance with 37-3-203;
(xii) prescription drug registry reports from the board of pharmacy in accordance with 37-7-1514;
(xiii) status reports on the special revenue account and fees charged as a funding source from the
board of funeral service in accordance with 37-19-204;
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(xiv) unemployment insurance program integrity act reports from the department of labor and
industry in accordance with 39-51-706;
(xv) law enforcement agency facial recognition technology use reports from the department of
justice in accordance with 44-15-111(3);
(xvi) reports on third-party vendors providing facial recognition services to state agencies reports in
accordance with 44-15-111(4)(b);
(xvii) status reports on the distressed wood products industry revolving loan program from the
department of commerce in accordance with 90-1-503;
(e) reports to the education interim committee, including:
(i) reemployment of retired teachers, specialists, and administrators reports from the retirement
board in accordance with 19-20-732;
(ii) a report on participation in the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military
children in accordance with 20-1-231;
(iii) grow your own grant program reports from the commissioner of higher education in accordance
with 20-4-601;
(iv) reports on out-of-district attendance from the superintendent of public instruction in accordance
with 20-5-324;
(v) reports from the education and workforce data governing board in accordance with 20-7-138;
(vi) state-level strengthening career and technical student organizations program reports from the
superintendent of public instruction in accordance with 20-7-320;
(vii) a report from the superintendent of public instruction concerning educational programs for
eligible children receiving in-state inpatient treatment of serious emotional disturbances in accordance with 20-
7-435;
(viii) reports from the Montana digital academy governing board in accordance with 20-7-1201;
(ix) advanced opportunity program reports from the board of public education in accordance with
20-7-1506;
(x) progress on transformational learning plans from the board of public education in accordance
with 20-7-1602;
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(xi) reports on early literacy targeted interventions from the superintendent of public instruction in
accordance with 20-7-1804;
(xii) budget amendments, if needed, from school districts in accordance with 20-9-161;
(xiii) reports regarding the Montana Indian language preservation program from the office of public
instruction in accordance with 20-9-537;
(xiv) annual Montana resident student financial aid program reports from the commissioner of higher
education in accordance with 20-26-105;
(xv) Montana foster youth higher education assistance program grant reports from the
commissioner of higher education in accordance with 20-26-633;
(xvi) a historic preservation office report from the historic preservation officer in accordance with 22-
3-423; and
(xvii) interdisciplinary child information agreement reports from the office of public instruction in
accordance with 52-2-211;
(f) reports to the energy and telecommunications interim committee, including:
(i) the high-performance building report from the department of administration in accordance with
17-7-214;
(ii) an annual report from the consumer counsel in accordance with 69-1-222;
(iii) annual universal system benefits reports from utilities, electric cooperatives, and the
department of revenue in accordance with 69-8-402;
(iv) small-scale hydroelectric power generation reports from the department of natural resources
and conservation in accordance with 85-1-501; and
(v) geothermal reports from the Montana bureau of mines and geology in accordance with 90-3-
1301;
(g) reports to the revenue interim committee, including:
(i) use of the qualified endowment tax credit report from the department of revenue in accordance
with 15-1-230;
(ii) tax rates for the upcoming reappraisal cycle from the department of revenue in accordance with
15-7-111;
- 13 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(iii) information about job growth incentive tax credits from the department of revenue in
accordance with 15-30-2361;
(iv) student scholarship contributions from the department of revenue in accordance with 15-30-
3112;
(v) media production tax credit economic impact reports from the department of commerce in
accordance with 15-31-1011; and
(vi) reports that actual or projected receipts will result in less revenue than estimated from the office
of budget and program planning, if necessary, in accordance with 17-7-140;
(h) reports to the transportation interim committee, including:
(i) biodiesel tax refunds from the department of transportation in accordance with 15-70-433;
(ii) cooperative agreement negotiations from the department of transportation in accordance with
15-70-450; and
(iii) a special fuels inspection report from the department of transportation in accordance with 61-
10-154;
(i) reports to the environmental quality council, including:
(i) compliance and enforcement reports required in accordance with 75-1-314;
(ii) the state solid waste management and resource recovery plan, every 5 years, from the
department of environmental quality in accordance with 75-10-111;
(iii) annual orphan share reports from the department of environmental quality in accordance with
75-10-743;
(iv) Libby asbestos superfund oversight committee reports in accordance with 75-10-1601;
(v) annual subdivision sanitation reports from the department of environmental quality in
accordance with 76-4-116;
(vi) quarterly reports from the department of environmental quality on the number and percentage
of overdue files in accordance with 76-4-116;
(vii) state trust land accessibility reports from the department of natural resources and conservation
in accordance with 77-1-820;
(viii) biennial land banking reports and annual state land cabin and home site sales reports from the
- 14 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
department of natural resources and conservation in accordance with 77-2-366;
(ix) biennially invasive species reports from the departments of fish, wildlife, and parks and natural
resources and conservation in accordance with 80-7-1006;
(x) annual invasive species council reports in accordance with 80-7-1203;
(xi) sand and gravel reports, if an investigation is completed, in accordance with 82-2-701;
(xii) reports from the western Montana conservation commission in accordance with 85-1-904;
(xiii) annual sage grouse population reports from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in
accordance with 87-1-201;
(xiv) annual gray wolf management reports from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in
accordance with 87-1-901;
(xv) biennial Tendoy Mountain sheep herd reports from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in
accordance with 87-2-702;
(xvi) wildlife habitat improvement project reports from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in
accordance with 87-5-807; and
(xvii) annual sage grouse oversight team activities and staffing reports in accordance with 87-5-918;
(j) reports to the water policy interim committee, including:
(i) drought and water supply advisory committee reports in accordance with 2-15-3308;
(ii) total maximum daily load reports from the department of environmental quality in accordance
with 75-5-703;
(iii) state water plans from the department of natural resources and conservation in accordance
with 85-1-203;
(iv) small-scale hydroelectric power generation reports from the department of natural resources
and conservation in accordance with 85-1-501;
(v) renewable resource grant and loan program reports from the department of natural resources
and conservation in accordance with 85-1-621;
(vi) reports from the western Montana conservation commission in accordance with 85-1-904;
(vii) quarterly adjudication reports from the department of natural resources and conservation and
the water court in accordance with 85-2-281;
- 15 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(viii) water reservation reports from the department of natural resources and conservation in
accordance with 85-2-316;
(ix) instream flow reports from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in accordance with 85-2-
436; and
(x) ground water investigation program reports from the bureau of mines and geology in
accordance with 85-2-525;
(k) reports to the local government interim committee, including:
(i) reports from the local government center on petitions received that resulted in the development
and delivery of training in accordance with 7-1-206;
(ii) sand and gravel, if an investigation is completed, in accordance with 82-2-701;
(iii) assistance to local governments on federal land management proposals from the department
of commerce in accordance with 90-1-182; and
(iv) emergency financial assistance to local government reports from the department of commerce,
if requests are made, in accordance with 90-6-703(2);
(l) reports to the state-tribal relations committee, including:
(i) reports from the missing indigenous persons review commission in accordance with 2-15-2018;
(ii) the Montana Indian language preservation program report from the office of public instruction in
accordance with 20-9-537;
(iii) reports from the missing and murdered indigenous persons task force advisory council in
accordance with 44-2-411;
(iv) a report from the department of justice on missing persons response team training grants
awarded in accordance with 44-2-416;
(v) state-tribal economic development commission activities reports from the state-tribal economic
development commission in accordance with 90-1-132; and
(vi) state-tribal economic development commission reports provided regularly by the state director
of Indian affairs in accordance with 90-11-102.
(4) Reports to the legislature include multistate compact and agreement reports, including:
(a) multistate tax compact reports in accordance with 15-1-601;
- 16 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(b) interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children reports in accordance with
20-1-230 and 20-1-231;
(c) compact for education reports in accordance with 20-2-501;
(d) Western regional higher education compact reports in accordance with 20-25-801;
(e) interstate insurance product regulation compact reports in accordance with 33-39-101;
(f) interstate medical licensure compact reports in accordance with 37-3-356;
(g) interstate compact on juveniles reports in accordance with 41-6-101;
(h) interstate compact for adult offender supervision reports in accordance with 46-23-1115;
(i) vehicle equipment safety compact reports in accordance with 61-2-201;
(j) multistate highway transportation agreement reports in accordance with 61-10-1101; and
(k) western interstate nuclear compact reports in accordance with 90-5-201.
(5) Reports, transfers, statements, assessments, recommendations and changes required under
17-7-138, 17-7-139, 17-7-140, 19-2-405, 19-2-407, 19-3-117, 19-20-201, 19-20-216, 23-7-202, 33-1-115, and
39-71-2375 must be provided as soon as the report is published and publicly available. Reports required in
subsections (2)(a), (2)(gg), (2)(ii), and (3)(b)(xi) must be provided following issuance of reports issued under
Title 5, chapter 13."
Section 2. Section 44-2-411, MCA, is amended to read:
"44-2-411. (Temporary) Missing and murdered indigenous persons task force advisory council
-- membership -- duties -- reporting. (1) There is a missing and murdered indigenous persons task force
advisory council. The task force advisory council is allocated to the department of justice for staffing services
and administrative purposes only.
(2) Task force Advisory council members, including the presiding officer, must be appointed by the
attorney general or a designee of the attorney general. The task force advisory council membership must
include but is not limited to:
(a) an employee of the department of justice who has expertise in the subject of missing persons;
(b) a representative from each federally recognized Indian tribe in Montana;
(c) a member from the Montana highway patrol homicide investigator;
- 17 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(d) a representative from the attorney general's office; and
(e) a representative from the office of public instruction.
(3) While respecting the government-to-government relationship between the state and each tribe,
the primary duties of the task force advisory council are to:
(a) identify jurisdictional barriers between federal, state, local, and tribal law enforcement and
community agencies;
(b) work to identify causes that contribute to missing and murdered indigenous persons and make
recommendations to federally recognized tribes in the state and applicable federal agencies to reduce cases of
missing and murdered indigenous persons;
(c) work to identify strategies to improve interagency communication, cooperation, and
collaboration to remove jurisdictional barriers and increase reporting and investigation of missing and murdered
indigenous persons; and
(d) administer the looping in native communities network grant program provided for in 44-2-412.
(4) A vacancy on the task force advisory council must be filled in the manner of the original
appointment.
(5) By July 1 prior to each regular legislative session, the task force advisory council shall, in
accordance with 5-11-210, prepare a written report of findings and recommendations for submission to the
state-tribal relations committee provided for in 5-5-229. The report must include the following information:
(a) the number of unique individuals reported to the missing and murdered indigenous persons
database;
(b) the number of unique individuals recovered as a result of the missing and murdered indigenous
persons database;
(c) the number of unique individuals recovered as a result of the looping in native communities
network grant program;
(d) the number of unique individuals searched for and recovered as a result of missing persons
response teams;
(e) the number of missing persons entries into the missing and murdered indigenous persons
database by year;
- 18 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(f) an analysis by year of the characteristics of missing indigenous persons, including but not
limited to age, gender, child protective services involvement status, foster case status, duration of time missing,
and estimated related cause;
(g) the number of actively missing indigenous persons by year;
(h) a description and the results of any noncompetitive grant awardee activities;
(i) a description of the activities and progress related to improving interagency communication,
cooperation, and collaboration and removing interjurisdictional barriers; and
(j) any other information the task force advisory council members find relevant to the task force's
advisory council's mission.
(6) In addition to the recommendations to federally recognized tribes in the state required under
subsection (3)(b), the task force advisory council may make recommendations to federal, state, and local
agencies in carrying out the task force's advisory council's duties. (Terminates June 30, 2033--sec. 2, Ch. 624,
L. 2023, sec. 3, Ch. 624, L. 2023, sec. 4, Ch. 624, L. 2023.)"
Section 3. Section 44-2-412, MCA, is amended to read:
"44-2-412. (Temporary) Looping in native communities network grant program. (1) There is a
looping in native communities network grant program. The program is established to create a network in
support of efforts by Montana tribes to identify, report, and find Native American persons who are missing. The
grant program is administered by the missing and murdered indigenous persons task force advisory council
established in 44-2-411.
(2) The grant program includes a competitive grant to be awarded to a tribal entity to create and
administer a central administration point for the looping in native communities network. The missing and
murdered indigenous persons task force advisory council shall develop the application and the criteria to award
the grant to a tribal entity. The criteria must include:
(a) policies and standards for technology and equipment, including data storage and security of
information entered into the network;
(b) standards for data verification;
(c) job qualifications and requirements for a data specialist to administer the network;
- 19 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
(d) development of a system to provide automatic initial alerts to law enforcement agencies and
tribal and community organizations when a missing indigenous person report is made, including determining
which law enforcement agencies will receive the automatic initial alert;
(e) development of a standard reporting form that includes space to provide the information
specified in subsection (4) to be used by the data specialist; and
(f) administrative rights for a designee at each participating tribal agency.
(3) The grant program may include additional smaller, noncompetitive grants to be awarded to a
qualifying tribal agency at each reservation that submits a complete application. The purpose of the grants
awarded under this subsection is to provide matching funds for some or all of the costs required for the tribal
agency to set up and maintain access to the looping in native communities network.
(4) The standard reporting form required under subsection (2)(e) must allow a data specialist to
enter information about the missing indigenous person, including but not limited to the missing person's:
(a) name and any aliases or nicknames;
(b) gender, age, height, weight, and other physical descriptive characteristics;
(c) last known location and related information, including the date of last contact with the missing
indigenous person and the person with whom the missing indigenous person last made contact; and
(d) photographs, including photographs obtained from an online or social media profile.
(Terminates June 30, 2033--sec. 2, Ch. 624, L. 2023, sec. 3, Ch. 624, L. 2023.)"
Section 4. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this act]
to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
Section 5. Coordination instruction. If both House Bill No. 83 and [this act] are passed and
approved, then [section 1 of House Bill No. 83] must read as follows:
Section 1. Missing and murdered indigenous persons advisory council account -- audit. (1)
There is a missing and murdered indigenous persons advisory council account in the state special revenue
fund established in 17-2-102. The account is administered by the department of justice.
(2) Money transferred from any lawful source, including but not limited to gifts, grants, donations,
- 20 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 545
securities, and other assets, public or private, may be deposited in the account.
(3) Money deposited in the account must be used pursuant to 44-2-411 and is subject to audits as
required by Title 5, chapter 13, part 3.
(4) Funds deposited in the account each year must be used by the department only for allowable
costs as determined by the department and approved by the missing and murdered indigenous persons
advisory council.
(5) Interest and income earned on the account and any unspent or unencumbered money in the
account at the end of a fiscal year must remain in the account."
Section 6. Coordination instruction. If both House Bill No. 83 and [this act] are passed and
approved, then [section 2 of House Bill No. 83] must read as follows:
"NEW SECTION. Section 2. Appropriation. There is appropriated $1 from the missing and
murdered indigenous persons advisory council account established in [section 1] to the department of justice
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purposes described in 44-2-411."
- END -
- 21 - Authorized Print Version – HB 545
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 545, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 545
INTRODUCED BY T. RUNNING WOLF, M. NIKOLAKAKOS, T. CROWE, J. SECKINGER, E. BYRNE, C.
SCHOMER, J. SOOKTIS, A. GRIFFITH, D. POWERS, M. CUFFE, C. SPRUNGER, D. FERN, M. FOX, G.
LAMMERS, R. MINER, J. COHENOUR, D. HAWK, D. HAYMAN, S. MORIGEAU, E. STAFMAN, M. THANE
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO MISSING AND MURDERED INDIGENOUS PERSONS; REVISING
THE NAME, MEMBERSHIP, AND DUTIES OF THE MISSING INDIGENOUS PERSONS TASK FORCE; AND
AMENDING SECTIONS 5-11-222, 44-2-411, AND 44-2-412, MCA.”